Nevada, session 83, AB443.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A board of county commissioners shall not enact any
ordinance or measure that imposes rent control.
Sec. 2. NRS 244.143 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.143 1. “Matter of local concern” means any matter that:
(a) Primarily affects or impacts areas located in the county, or
persons who reside, work, visit or are otherwise present in areas
located in the county, and does not have a significant effect or
impact on areas located in other counties;
(b) Is not within the exclusive jurisdiction of another
governmental entity; and
(c) Does not concern:
(1) A state interest that requires statewide uniformity of
regulation;
(2) The regulation of business activities that are subject to
substantial regulation by a federal or state agency; or
(3) Any other federal or state interest that is committed by
the Constitution, statutes or regulations of the United States or this
State to federal or state regulation that preempts local regulation.
2. The term includes, without limitation, any of the following
matters of local concern:
(a) Public health, safety and welfare in the county.
(b) [Planning, zoning, development and redevelopment in the
county.
(c)] Nuisances and graffiti in the county.
[(d)] (c) Outdoor assemblies in the county.
[(e)] (d) Contracts and purchasing by county government.
[(f)] (e) Operation, management and control of county jails and
prisoners by county government.
[(g)] (f) Any public property, buildings, lands, utilities and
other public works owned, leased, operated, managed or controlled
by county government, including, without limitation:
(1) Roads, highways and bridges.
(2) Parks, recreational centers, cultural centers, libraries and
museums.
3. The provisions of subsection 2:
(a) Are intended to be illustrative;
(b) Are not intended to be exhaustive or exclusive; and
(c) Must not be interpreted as either limiting or expanding the
meaning of the term “matter of local concern” as provided in
subsection 1.
-
*AB443*

– 5 –
Sec. 3. NRS 244.3603 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.3603 1. Each board of county commissioners may, by
ordinance, to protect the public health, safety and welfare of the
residents of the county, adopt procedures pursuant to which the
district attorney may file an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to:
(a) Seek the abatement of a chronic nuisance that is located or
occurring within the unincorporated area of the county;
(b) If applicable, seek the closure of the property where the
chronic nuisance is located or occurring; and
(c) If applicable, seek penalties against the owner of the property
within the unincorporated area of the county and any other
appropriate relief.
2. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Contain procedures pursuant to which the owner of the
property is:
(1) Sent a notice, by certified mail, return receipt requested,
by the sheriff or other person authorized to issue a citation of the
existence on the owner’s property of nuisance activities and the date
by which the owner must abate the condition to prevent the matter
from being submitted to the district attorney for legal action.
(2) If the chronic nuisance is not an immediate danger to the
public health, safety or welfare and was caused by the criminal
activity of a person other than the owner, afforded a minimum of 30
days to abate the chronic nuisance.
(3) Afforded an opportunity for a hearing before a court of
competent jurisdiction.
(b) Provide that the date specified in the notice by which the
owner must abate the condition is tolled for the period during which
the owner requests a hearing and receives a decision.
(c) Provide the manner in which the county will recover money
expended to abate the condition on the property if the owner fails to
abate the condition.
3. If the court finds that a chronic nuisance exists and action is
necessary to avoid serious threat to the public welfare or the safety
or health of the occupants of the property, the court may order the
county to secure and close the property until the nuisance is abated
and may:
(a) Impose a civil penalty:
(1) If the property is nonresidential property, of not more
than $750 per day; or
(2) If the property is residential property, of not more than
$500 per day,
-
*AB443*

– 6 –
 for each day that the condition was not abated after the date
specified in the notice by which the owner was required to abate the
condition;
(b) Order the owner to pay the county for the cost incurred by
the county in abating the condition; and
(c) Order any other appropriate relief.
4. In addition to any other reasonable means authorized by the
court for the recovery of money expended by the county to abate the
chronic nuisance and, except as otherwise provided in subsection 5,
for the collection of civil penalties imposed pursuant to subsection
3, the board or its designee may make the expense and civil
penalties a special assessment against the property upon which the
chronic nuisance is located or occurring. The special assessment
may be collected pursuant to the provisions set forth in subsection 4
of NRS 244.360.
5. Any civil penalties that have not been collected from the
owner of the property may not be made a special assessment against
the property pursuant to subsection 4 by the board or its designee
unless:
(a) At least 180 days have elapsed after the date specified in the
order of the court by which the owner must abate the chronic
nuisance or, if the owner appeals that order, the date specified in the
order of the appellate court by which the owner must abate the
chronic nuisance, whichever is later;
(b) The owner has been billed, served or otherwise notified that
the civil penalties are due; and
(c) The amount of the uncollected civil penalties is more than
$5,000.
6. If a designee of the board imposes a special assessment
pursuant to subsection 4, the designee shall submit a written report
to the board at least once each calendar quarter that sets forth, for
each property against which such an assessment has been imposed:
(a) The street address or assessor’s parcel number of the
property;
(b) The name of each owner of record of the property as of the
date of the assessment; and
(c) The total amount of the assessment, stating the amount
assessed for the expense of abatement and any amount assessed for
civil penalties.
7. As used in this section:
(a) A “chronic nuisance” exists:
(1) When three or more nuisance activities exist or have
occurred during any 90-day period on the property.
-
*AB443*

– 7 –
(2) When a person associated with the property has engaged
in three or more nuisance activities during any 90-day period on the
property or within 100 feet of the property.
(3) When the property has been the subject of a search
warrant based on probable cause of continuous or repeated
violations of chapter 459 of NRS.
(4) When a building or place is used for the purpose of
unlawfully selling, serving, storing, keeping, manufacturing, using
or giving away a controlled substance, immediate precursor or
controlled substance analog.
(5) When a building or place was used for the purpose of
unlawfully manufacturing a controlled substance, immediate
precursor or controlled substance analog and:
(I) The building or place has not been deemed safe for
habitation by a governmental entity; or
(II) All materials or substances involving the controlled
substance, immediate precursor or controlled substance analog have
not been removed from or remediated on the building or place by an
entity certified or licensed to do so within 180 days after the
building or place is no longer used for the purpose of unlawfully
manufacturing a controlled substance, immediate precursor or
controlled substance analog.
(b) “Commercial real estate” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 645.8711.
(c) “Controlled substance analog” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 453.043.
(d) “Immediate precursor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 453.086.
(e) “Nuisance activity” means:
(1) Criminal activity;
(2) The presence of debris, litter, garbage, rubble, abandoned
or junk vehicles or junk appliances;
(3) Violations of building codes, housing codes or any other
codes regulating the health or safety of occupants of real property;
(4) Excessive noise and violations of curfew; or
(5) Any other activity, behavior or conduct defined by the
board to constitute a public nuisance.
(f) “Person associated with the property” means:
(1) The owner of the property;
(2) The manager or assistant manager of the property;
(3) The tenant of the property; or
(4) A person who, on the occasion of a nuisance activity, has:
(I) Entered, patronized or visited;
(II) Attempted to enter, patronize or visit; or
-
*AB443*

– 8 –
(III) Waited to enter, patronize or visit,
 the property or a person present on the property.
(g) “Residential property” means:
(1) Improved real estate that consists of not more than four
residential units;
(2) Unimproved real estate for which not more than four
residential units may be developed or constructed pursuant to [any
zoning regulations or] any development plan applicable to the real
estate; or
(3) A single-family residential unit, including, without
limitation, a condominium, townhouse or home within a
subdivision, if the unit is sold, leased or otherwise conveyed unit by
unit, regardless of whether the unit is part of a larger building or
parcel that consists of more than four units.
 The term does not include commercial real estate.
Sec. 4. NRS 244.3675 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.3675 Subject to the limitations set forth in NRS 244.368,
278.02315, 278.580, 278.582, 278.584, 278.5846, 278.586, 444.340
to 444.430, inclusive, and 477.030, and sections 9 to 14, inclusive,
of this act, the boards of county commissioners within their
respective counties may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property within
the county.
2. Adopt any building, electrical, housing, plumbing or safety
code necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and
establish such fees as may be necessary. Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 278.580, these fees do not apply to the State of
Nevada or the Nevada System of Higher Education.
Sec. 5. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The governing body of an incorporated city shall not enact any
ordinance or measure that imposes rent control.
Sec. 6. NRS 268.003 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.003 1. “Matter of local concern” means any matter that:
(a) Primarily affects or impacts areas located in the incorporated
city, or persons who reside, work, visit or are otherwise present in
areas located in the city, and does not have a significant effect or
impact on areas located in other cities or counties;
(b) Is not within the exclusive jurisdiction of another
governmental entity; and
(c) Does not concern:
(1) A state interest that requires statewide uniformity of
regulation;
-
*AB443*

– 9 –
(2) The regulation of business activities that are subject to
substantial regulation by a federal or state agency; or
(3) Any other federal or state interest that is committed by
the Constitution, statutes or regulations of the United States or this
State to federal or state regulation that preempts local regulation.
2. The term includes, without limitation, any of the following
matters of local concern:
(a) Public health, safety and welfare in the city.
(b) [Planning, zoning, development and redevelopment in the
city.
(c)] Nuisances and graffiti in the city.
[(d)] (c) Outdoor assemblies in the city.
[(e)] (d) Contracts and purchasing by city government.
[(f)] (e) Operation, management and control of city jails and
prisoners by city government.
[(g)] (f) Any public property, buildings, lands, utilities and
other public works owned, leased, operated, managed or controlled
by city government, including, without limitation:
(1) Roads, highways and bridges.
(2) Parks, recreational centers, cultural centers, libraries and
museums.
3. The provisions of subsection 2:
(a) Are intended to be illustrative;
(b) Are not intended to be exhaustive or exclusive; and
(c) Must not be interpreted as either limiting or expanding the
meaning of the term “matter of local concern” as provided in
subsection 1.
Sec. 7. NRS 268.413 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.413 Subject to the limitations contained in NRS 244.368,
278.02315, 278.580, 278.582, 278.584, 278.5846, 278.586, 444.340
to 444.430, inclusive, and 477.030, and sections 9 to 14, inclusive,
of this act, the city council or other governing body of an
incorporated city may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property within
the city.
2. Adopt any building, electrical, plumbing or safety code
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and establish
such fees as may be necessary. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 278.580, those fees do not apply to the State of Nevada or the
Nevada System of Higher Education.
-
*AB443*

– 10 –
Sec. 8. Chapter 278 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 9. 1. Notwithstanding any health, safety, building or
fire code adopted by a governing body, each governing body shall
by ordinance authorize:
(a) Single-staircase apartment buildings of not more than five
stories; and
(b) Single-room occupancy housing.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Single-room occupancy housing” means housing where
one person lives in a single room or apartment. The term includes,
without limitation, a boarding house or rooming house where
residents share communal kitchen or bathroom facilities.
(b) “Single-staircase apartment building” means a building
with one staircase on each floor of the building for purposes of
egress, regardless of the number of floors contained in the
building.
Sec. 10. 1. A governing body shall not adopt an ordinance
that prohibits multi-family housing or mixed-use development in
any area zoned for commercial use.
2. A governing body shall authorize by ordinance the
conversion of any commercial building into multi-family housing,
including, without limitation, apartments and buildings of
duplexes, triplexes and fourplexes.
Sec. 11. A governing body shall, in any area that is zoned for
residential use, authorize the development of multi-family
housing, including, without limitation, apartments and buildings
of duplexes, triplexes and fourplexes.
Sec. 12. 1. A governing body shall not impose any of the
following restrictions on the zoning or development of residential
housing:
(a) Minimum parking requirements.
(b) Height restrictions.
(c) Minimum lot size.
(d) Setback requirements.
(e) Limitations on square footage of the residential housing.
2. In addition to the restrictions set forth in subsection 1, a
governing body shall not limit residential or commercial
development by creating any urban growth boundary.
Sec. 13. 1. Each governing body of a county and each
governing body of a city shall adopt an ordinance to authorize the
owner of a single-family residential property to add an accessory
dwelling unit to the single-family residential property.
2. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must:
-
*AB443*

– 11 –
(a) Require the owner of the single-family residential property
to:
(1) Reside in the single-family residence or accessory
dwelling unit that is located on the single-family residential
property; and
(2) Otherwise use the single-family residence or accessory
dwelling unit in which the owner does not reside only for family
members or other persons with whom the owner has a personal or
employment relationship;
(b) Require that the accessory dwelling unit match the exterior
design, roof pitch and finishing materials of the single-family
residence;
(c) Prohibit the owner of the single-family residential property
from renting the accessory dwelling unit as transient lodging or
other short-term housing for a duration of less than 90 days; and
(d) Require any necessary improvement or repair to a public
street that is disturbed during the construction of the accessory
dwelling unit.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing:
(a) An accessory dwelling unit on any single-family residential
property on which there is a restrictive covenant that prohibits the
addition of an accessory dwelling unit on the single-family
residential property; or
(b) The governing body to require a restrictive covenant on a
single-family residential property that adds an accessory dwelling
unit pursuant to the ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 1.
4. As used in this section, “accessory dwelling unit” means a
self-contained living unit that:
(a) Is located on the same parcel as a single-family residence
of greater square footage;
(b) Has separate cooking, sleeping and sanitation facilities
from the single-family residence; and
(c) Complies with any applicable building code, housing code
or other code regulating the health or safety of occupants of
residential property.
Sec. 14. 1. The governing body of each county and the
governing body of each city shall establish an expedited process
for the by-right development of residential housing, including,
without limitation, multi-family housing.
2. The expedited process established pursuant to subsection 1
must, without limitation, provide that any proposed project for the
development of residential housing will be approved by the county
or city, as applicable, without any discretionary review or
discretionary approval if the proposed project is consistent with all
applicable zoning laws, building codes, housing codes and any
-
*AB443*

– 12 –
other applicable ordinances and codes regulating the health or
safety of occupants of real property.
3. A final decision relating to an application for a proposed
project for the development of residential housing that is
submitted pursuant to the expedited process established pursuant
to subsection 1 must be made within 60 days after the receipt of a
completed application or the application shall be deemed
approved. If an application is denied, the denial must set forth the
specific reasons why the application was denied.
4. Only an owner of real property that is physically adjacent
to a proposed project for the development of residential housing or
the applicant for a proposed project may appeal a final decision
relating to an application for the proposed project. Any party who
challenges the approval of the application must demonstrate by
clear and convincing evidence that the proposed project is not
consistent with all applicable zoning laws, building codes, housing
codes and any other ordinance or code regulating the health or
safety of occupants of real property. If the applicant for a
proposed project prevails in an action brought by an owner of
property that is physically adjacent to the proposed project, the
district court shall award to the applicant attorney’s fees and costs.
Sec. 15. NRS 278.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.020 1. For the purpose of promoting health, safety,
morals, or the general welfare of the community, the governing
bodies of cities and counties are authorized and empowered to
regulate and restrict the improvement of land and to control the
location and soundness of structures.
2. Any such regulation, restriction and control must [take] :
(a) Comply with any restriction on the power of the governing
bodies of cities and counties, as set forth in this chapter and
chapters 244 and 268 of NRS, as applicable; and
(b) Take into account:
[(a)] (1) The potential impairment of natural resources and the
total population which the available natural resources will support
without unreasonable impairment; and
[(b)] (2) The availability of and need for affordable housing in
the community, including affordable housing that is accessible to
persons with disabilities.
Sec. 16. NRS 278.0201 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.0201 1. In the manner prescribed by ordinance, a
governing body may, upon application of any person having a legal
or equitable interest in land, enter into an agreement with that
person concerning the development of that land.
2. An agreement entered into pursuant to this section:
(a) Must contain provisions:
-
*AB443*

– 13 –
(1) Describing the land which is the subject of the
agreement;
(2) Specifying the duration of the agreement;
(3) Specifying what events will constitute breach of the
agreement; and
(4) Providing periods during which any breach may be cured;
and
(b) May contain provisions specifying or relating to:
(1) [The] Except as otherwise provided in sections 9 to 14,
inclusive, of this act, the permitted uses of the land;
(2) The density or intensity of the use of the land;
(3) [The] Except as otherwise provided in sections 9 to 14,
inclusive, of this act, the maximum height and size of any proposed
buildings;
(4) The reservation or dedication of any portion of the land
for public use or for the payment of fees in lieu thereof;
(5) The protection of environmentally sensitive lands;
(6) The preservation and restoration of historic structures;
(7) The phasing or timing of construction or development on
the land, including, without limitation, the dates on which all or any
part of the construction or development must commence and be
completed, and the terms on which any deadline may be extended;
(8) The conditions, terms, restrictions and requirements for
infrastructure on the land and the financing of the public
infrastructure by a person having a legal or equitable interest in the
land;
(9) The conditions, terms, restrictions and requirements for
annexation of land by the city or county and the phasing or timing of
annexation by the city or county;
(10) The conditions, terms, restrictions and requirements
relating to the intent of the governing body to include the land in an
improvement district created pursuant to chapter 271 of NRS;
(11) A schedule of fees and charges; and
(12) Any other matters relating to the development of the
land.
3. Unless the agreement otherwise provides and except as
otherwise provided in subsection 4, the ordinances, resolutions or
regulations applicable to that land and governing the permitted uses
of that land, density and standards for design, improvements and
construction are those in effect at the time the agreement is made.
4. This section does not prohibit the governing body from
adopting new ordinances, resolutions or regulations applicable to
that land which do not conflict with those ordinances, resolutions
and regulations in effect at the time the agreement is made, except
that any subsequent action by the governing body must not prevent
-
*AB443*

– 14 –
the development of the land as set forth in the agreement. The
governing body is not prohibited from denying or conditionally
approving any other plan for development pursuant to any
ordinance, resolution or regulation in effect at the time of that denial
or approval.
Sec. 17. NRS 278.02073 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
278.02073 1. A director of planning or a governing body
may extend the period for which a building permit for a residential
or commercial project is valid if the person to whom the permit has
been issued:
(a) Applies for an extension before July 1, 2013, subject to any
applicable ordinances or regulations adopted by the governing body;
(b) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the director of planning
or governing body that:
(1) Financing for the residential or commercial project is not
available; and
(2) The land will be leased for a renewable energy generation
project; and
(c) Submits with his or her application for an extension an
affidavit showing that due diligence has been used to obtain
financing for the residential or commercial project. The affidavit
must include, without limitation, evidence that:
(1) The project was denied financing by at least two lenders;
or
(2) The person was unable to issue bonds or other securities
to finance the project.
2. A building permit that is extended pursuant to subsection 1
must not be effective:
(a) For more than 15 years after the original expiration date of
the building permit; or
(b) If the land ceases to be leased for a renewable energy
generation project, after the period established by the director of
planning or governing body pursuant to subsection 3.
3. If a director of planning or governing body extends the
period for which a building permit is valid pursuant to subsection 1,
the director of planning or governing body shall establish the
maximum duration of the period for which the permit will remain
valid if the land is no longer leased for a renewable energy
generation project.
4. If a director of planning or governing body extends the
period for which a building permit is valid pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) [No] Except as otherwise provided in sections 9 to 14,
inclusive, of this act, no condition may be placed on the permit that
was not imposed on the original permit; and
-
*AB443*

– 15 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 [,] and
sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act, the ordinances, resolutions or
regulations applicable to the land and governing the permitted uses
of the land, density and standards for design, improvements and
construction are those in effect at the time the building permit is
issued.
5. [Changes] Except as otherwise provided in sections 9 to 14,
inclusive, of this act, changes to ordinances, resolutions or
regulations that enforce environmental, life or safety standards
against parcels of land that the director of planning or governing
body determines are similar to the land for which the building
permit was issued will apply to the parcel of land for which the
permit was issued.
6. As used in this section, “environmental, life or safety
standards” includes, without limitation:
(a) Standards and codes relating to the usage of water; and
(b) Any specialized or uniform code related to environmental,
life or safety standards.
Sec. 18. NRS 278.0209 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.0209 1. In any ordinance relating to the zoning of land
adopted or amended by a governing body, the definition of “single-
family residence” must include factory-built housing that has been
built in compliance with the standards for single-family residential
dwellings of the Uniform Building Code most recently adopted by
the International Conference of Building Officials.
2. An ordinance of the governing body may require factory-
built housing to comply with standards for safety which exceed the
standards prescribed in subsection 1 if a single-family residential
dwelling on the same lot is also required to comply with those
standards.
3. The governing body shall adopt the same standards for
development for the factory-built housing and the lot on which it is
placed as those to which a conventional single-family residential
dwelling on the same lot would be subject, including, but not
limited to:
(a) Requirements for the setback of buildings.
(b) Side and rear-yard requirements.
(c) Standards for enclosures, access and the parking of vehicles.
(d) Aesthetic requirements.
(e) Requirements for minimum square footage.
(f) Requirements for design, style and structure.
4. The governing body may prohibit the installation of factory-
built housing in a specified area if [:
(a) More] more than 6 years have elapsed between the date of
manufacture of factory-built housing and the date of the application
-
*AB443*

– 16 –
for the issuance of a permit to install factory-built housing in the
affected area . [; or
(b) The area contains a building, structure or other object having
a special character or special historical interest or value.]
5. As used in this section, “factory-built housing” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 461.080.
6. The provisions of this section do not abrogate a recorded
restrictive covenant.
Sec. 19. NRS 278.0274 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.0274 [The] Except as otherwise provided in sections 9 to
14, inclusive, of this act, the comprehensive regional plan must
include goals, policies, maps and other documents relating to:
1. Population, including a projection of population growth in
the region and the resources that will be necessary to support that
population.
2. Conservation, including policies relating to the use and
protection of air, land, water and other natural resources, ambient air
quality, natural recharge areas, floodplains and wetlands, and a map
showing the areas that are best suited for development based on
those policies.
3. The limitation of the premature expansion of development
into undeveloped areas, preservation of neighborhoods and
revitalization of urban areas, including, without limitation, policies
that relate to the interspersion of new housing and businesses in
established neighborhoods and set forth principles by which growth
will be directed to older urban areas.
4. Land use and transportation, including the classification of
future land uses by density or intensity of development based upon
the projected necessity and availability of public facilities,
including, without limitation, schools, and services and natural
resources, and the compatibility of development in one area with
that of other areas in the region. This portion of the plan must:
(a) Address, if applicable:
(1) Mixed-use development, transit-oriented development,
master-planned communities and gaming enterprise districts; and
(2) The coordination and compatibility of land uses with
each military installation in the region, taking into account the
location, purpose and stated mission of the military installation;
(b) Allow for a variety of uses;
(c) Describe the transportation facilities that will be necessary to
satisfy the requirements created by those future uses; and
(d) Be based upon the policies and map relating to conservation
that are developed pursuant to subsection 2, surveys, studies and
data relating to the area, the amount of land required to
accommodate planned growth, the population of the area projected
-
*AB443*

– 17 –
pursuant to subsection 1, and the characteristics of undeveloped land
in the area.
5. Public facilities and services, including provisions relating to
sanitary sewer facilities, solid waste, flood control, potable water
and groundwater aquifer recharge which are correlated with
principles and guidelines for future land uses, and which specify
ways to satisfy the requirements created by those future uses. This
portion of the plan must:
(a) Describe the problems and needs of the area relating to
public facilities and services and the general facilities that will be
required for their solution and satisfaction;
(b) Identify the providers of public services within the region
and the area within which each must serve, including service
territories set by the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada for
public utilities;
(c) Establish the time within which those public facilities and
services necessary to support the development relating to land use
and transportation must be made available to satisfy the
requirements created by that development; and
(d) Contain a summary prepared by the regional planning
commission regarding the plans for capital improvements that:
(1) Are required to be prepared by each local government in
the region pursuant to NRS 278.0226; and
(2) May be prepared by the water planning commission of
the county, the regional transportation commission and the county
school district.
6. Annexation, including the identification of spheres of
influence for each unit of local government, improvement district or
other service district and specifying standards and policies for
changing the boundaries of a sphere of influence and procedures for
the review of development within each sphere of influence. As used
in this subsection, “sphere of influence” means an area into which a
political subdivision may expand in the foreseeable future.
7. Intergovernmental coordination, including the establishment
of guidelines for determining whether local master plans and
facilities plans conform with the comprehensive regional plan.
8. Any utility project required to be reported pursuant to
NRS 278.145.
Sec. 20. NRS 278.0284 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.0284 [Any]
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections 9
to 14, inclusive, of this act, any action of a local government
relating to development, zoning, the subdivision of land or capital
improvements must conform to the master plan of the local
government. [In] Except as otherwise provided in this section, in
-
*AB443*

– 18 –
adopting any ordinance or regulation relating to development,
zoning, the subdivision of land or capital improvements, the local
government shall make a specific finding that the ordinance
conforms to the master plan. [Within] Except as otherwise provided
in this section, within 1 year after its adoption of any portion of a
master plan, the local government shall review and, if necessary,
amend its existing ordinances to ensure their conformity with the
provisions of the master plan. [If] Except as otherwise provided in
this section, if any provision of the master plan is inconsistent with
any regulation relating to land development, the provision of the
master plan governs any action taken in regard to an application for
development.
2. Any provision of the master plan that is not consistent with
the provisions of sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act, does not
govern any action taken in regard to an application for
development.
Sec. 21. NRS 278.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.160 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 278.150 and 278.170, the master plan, with the accompanying
charts, drawings, diagrams, schedules and reports, may include such
of the following elements or portions thereof as are appropriate to
the city, county or region, and , except as otherwise provided in
sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act, as may be made the basis for
the physical development thereof:
(a) A conservation element, which must include:
(1) A conservation plan for the conservation, development
and utilization of natural resources, including, without limitation,
water and its hydraulic force, underground water, water supply,
solar or wind energy, forests, soils, rivers and other waters, harbors,
fisheries, wildlife, minerals and other natural resources. The
conservation plan must also cover the reclamation of land and
waters, flood control, prevention and control of the pollution of
streams and other waters, regulation of the use of land in stream
channels and other areas required for the accomplishment of the
conservation plan, prevention, control and correction of the erosion
of soils through proper clearing, grading and landscaping, beaches
and shores, and protection of watersheds. The conservation plan
must also indicate the maximum tolerable level of air pollution.
(2) A solid waste disposal plan showing general plans for the
disposal of solid waste.
(b) A historic preservation element, which must include:
(1) A historic neighborhood preservation plan which:
(I) Must include, without limitation, a plan to inventory
historic neighborhoods and a statement of goals and methods to
encourage the preservation of historic neighborhoods.
-
*AB443*

– 19 –
(II) May include, without limitation, the creation of a
commission to monitor and promote the preservation of historic
neighborhoods.
(2) A historical properties preservation plan setting forth an
inventory of significant historical, archaeological, paleontological
and architectural properties as defined by a city, county or region,
and a statement of methods to encourage the preservation of those
properties.
(c) A housing element, which must include, without limitation:
(1) An inventory of housing conditions and needs, and plans
and procedures for improving housing standards and providing
adequate housing to individuals and families in the community,
regardless of income level.
(2) An inventory of existing affordable housing in the
community, including, without limitation, housing that is available
to rent or own, housing that is subsidized either directly or indirectly
by this State, an agency or political subdivision of this State, or the
Federal Government or an agency of the Federal Government, and
housing that is accessible to persons with disabilities.
(3) An analysis of projected growth and the demographic
characteristics of the community.
(4) A determination of the present and prospective need for
affordable housing in the community.
(5) An analysis of any impediments to the development of
affordable housing and the development of policies to mitigate those
impediments.
(6) An analysis of the characteristics of the land that is
suitable for residential development. The analysis must include,
without limitation:
(I) A determination of whether the existing infrastructure
is sufficient to sustain the current needs and projected growth of the
community; and
(II) An inventory of available parcels that are suitable for
residential development and any zoning, environmental and other
land-use planning restrictions that affect such parcels.
(7) An analysis of the needs and appropriate methods for the
construction of affordable housing or the conversion or
rehabilitation of existing housing to affordable housing.
(8) A plan for maintaining and developing affordable
housing to meet the housing needs of the community for a period of
at least 5 years.
(d) A land use element, which must include:
(1) Provisions concerning community design, including
standards and principles governing the subdivision of land and
suggestive patterns for community design and development.
-
*AB443*

– 20 –
(2) A land use plan, including an inventory and classification
of types of natural land and of existing land cover and uses, and
comprehensive plans for the most desirable utilization of land. The
land use plan:
(I) Must, if applicable, address mixed-use development,
transit-oriented development, master-planned communities and
gaming enterprise districts. The land use plan must also, if
applicable, address the coordination and compatibility of land uses
with any military installation in the city, county or region, taking
into account the location, purpose and stated mission of the military
installation.
(II) May include a provision concerning the acquisition
and use of land that is under federal management within the city,
county or region, including, without limitation, a plan or statement
of policy prepared pursuant to NRS 321.7355.
(3) In any county whose population is 700,000 or more, a
rural neighborhoods preservation plan showing general plans to
preserve the character and density of rural neighborhoods.
(e) A public facilities and services element, which must include:
(1) An economic plan showing recommended schedules for
the allocation and expenditure of public money to provide for the
economical and timely execution of the various components of the
plan.
(2) A population plan setting forth an estimate of the total
population which the natural resources of the city, county or region
will support on a continuing basis without unreasonable impairment.
(3) An aboveground utility plan that shows corridors
designated for the construction of aboveground utilities and
complies with the provisions of NRS 278.165.
(4) Provisions concerning public buildings showing the
locations and arrangement of civic centers and all other public
buildings, including the architecture thereof and the landscape
treatment of the grounds thereof.
(5) Provisions concerning public services and facilities
showing general plans for sewage, drainage and utilities, and rights-
of-way, easements and facilities therefor, including, without
limitation, any utility projects required to be reported pursuant to
NRS 278.145. If a public utility which provides electric service
notifies the planning commission that a new transmission line or
substation will be required to support the master plan, those
facilities must be included in the master plan. The utility is not
required to obtain an easement for any such transmission line as a
prerequisite to the inclusion of the transmission line in the master
plan.
-
*AB443*

– 21 –
(6) A school facilities plan showing the general locations of
current and future school facilities based upon information furnished
by the appropriate county school district.
(f) A recreation and open space element, which must include a
recreation plan showing a comprehensive system of recreation areas,
including, without limitation, natural reservations, parks, parkways,
trails, reserved riverbank strips, beaches, playgrounds and other
recreation areas, including, when practicable, the locations and
proposed development thereof.
(g) A safety element, which must include:
(1) In any county whose population is 700,000 or more, a
safety plan identifying potential types of natural and man-made
hazards, including, without limitation, hazards from floods,
landslides or fires, or resulting from the manufacture, storage,
transfer or use of bulk quantities of hazardous materials. The safety
plan may set forth policies for avoiding or minimizing the risks from
those hazards.
(2) A seismic safety plan consisting of an identification and
appraisal of seismic hazards such as susceptibility to surface
ruptures from faulting, to ground shaking or to ground failures.
(h) A transportation element, which must include:
(1) A streets and highways plan showing the general
locations and widths of a comprehensive system of major traffic
thoroughfares and other traffic ways and of streets and the
recommended treatment thereof, building line setbacks, and a
system of naming or numbering streets and numbering houses, with
recommendations concerning proposed changes.
(2) A transit plan showing a proposed multimodal system of
transit lines, including mass transit, streetcar, motorcoach and
trolley coach lines, paths for bicycles and pedestrians, satellite
parking and related facilities.
(3) A transportation plan showing a comprehensive
transportation system, including, without limitation, locations of
rights-of-way, terminals, viaducts and grade separations. The
transportation plan may also include port, harbor, aviation and
related facilities.
(i) An urban agricultural element, which must include a plan to
inventory any vacant lands or other real property owned by the city
or county and blighted land in the city or county to determine
whether such lands are suitable for urban farming and gardening.
The plan to inventory any vacant lands or other real property may
include, without limitation, any other real property in the city or
county, as deemed appropriate by the commission.
2. The commission may prepare and adopt, as part of the
master plan, other and additional plans and reports dealing with such
-
*AB443*

– 22 –
other elements as may in its judgment relate to the physical
development of the city, county or region, and nothing contained in
NRS 278.010 to 278.630, inclusive, and sections 9 to 14, inclusive,
of this act prohibits the preparation and adoption of any such
element as a part of the master plan.
Sec. 22. NRS 278.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.250 1. For the purposes of NRS 278.010 to 278.630,
inclusive, and sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act, the governing
body may divide the city, county or region into zoning districts of
such number, shape and area as are best suited to carry out the
purposes of NRS 278.010 to 278.630, inclusive [. Within] , and
sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act. Except as otherwise provided
in sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act, within the zoning district,
[it] the governing body may regulate and restrict the erection,
construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or use of buildings,
structures or land.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this section and
sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act, zoning regulations must [be
adopted in accordance with the master plan for land use and] be
designed:
(a) To preserve the quality of air and water resources.
(b) To promote the conservation of open space and the
protection of other natural and scenic resources from unreasonable
impairment.
(c) To consider existing views and access to solar resources by
studying the height of new buildings which will cast shadows on
surrounding residential and commercial developments.
(d) To reduce the consumption of energy by encouraging the use
of products and materials which maximize energy efficiency in the
construction of buildings.
(e) To provide for recreational needs.
(f) To protect life and property in areas subject to floods,
landslides and other natural disasters.
(g) To conform to the adopted population plan, if required by
NRS 278.170.
(h) To develop a timely, orderly and efficient arrangement of
transportation and public facilities and services, including public
access and sidewalks for pedestrians, and facilities and services for
bicycles.
(i) To ensure that the development on land is commensurate
with the character and the physical limitations of the land.
(j) To take into account the immediate and long-range financial
impact of the application of particular land to particular kinds of
development, and the relative suitability of the land for
development.
-
*AB443*

– 23 –
(k) To promote health and the general welfare.
(l) To ensure the development of an adequate supply of housing
for the community, including the development of affordable
housing.
(m) To ensure the protection of existing neighborhoods and
communities, including the protection of rural preservation
neighborhoods and, in counties whose population is 700,000 or
more, the protection of historic neighborhoods.
(n) To promote systems which use solar or wind energy.
(o) To foster the coordination and compatibility of land uses
with any military installation in the city, county or region, taking
into account the location, purpose and stated mission of the military
installation.
3. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this section and
sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act, the zoning regulations must
be adopted with reasonable consideration, among other things, to the
character of the area and its peculiar suitability for particular uses,
and with a view to conserving the value of buildings and
encouraging the most appropriate use of land throughout the city,
county or region.
4. [In] Except as otherwise provided in this section, and
sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act, in exercising the powers
granted in this section, the governing body may use any controls
relating to land use or principles of zoning that the governing body
determines to be appropriate, including, without limitation, density
bonuses, inclusionary zoning and minimum density zoning.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Density bonus” means an incentive granted by a governing
body to a developer of real property that authorizes the developer to
build at a greater density than would otherwise be allowed under the
master plan, in exchange for an agreement by the developer to
perform certain functions that the governing body determines to be
socially desirable, including, without limitation, developing an area
to include a certain proportion of affordable housing.
(b) “Inclusionary zoning” means a type of zoning pursuant to
which a governing body requires or provides incentives to a
developer who builds residential dwellings to build a certain
percentage of those dwellings as affordable housing.
(c) “Minimum density zoning” means a type of zoning pursuant
to which development must be carried out at or above a certain
density to maintain conformance with the master plan.
Sec. 23. NRS 278.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.253 1. [A governing body of a county whose population
is 100,000 or more or a governing body of a city whose population
is 150,000 or more shall adopt] In an ordinance [for the zoning of]
-
*AB443*

– 24 –
relating to the zoning of land adopted or amended by a governing
body, the definition of “single-family residence” must include tiny
houses . [that:
(a) Designates at least one zoning district in which a tiny house
may be located and classified as an accessory dwelling unit;
(b) Designates at least one zoning district in which a tiny house
may be located and classified as a single-family residential unit; and
(c) Designates at least one zoning district in which a tiny house
may be located in a tiny house park.
2. A governing body of a county whose population is less than
100,000 or a governing body of a city whose population is less than
150,000 shall adopt an ordinance for the zoning of tiny houses that:
(a) Designates at least one zoning district in which a tiny house
may be located and classified as an accessory dwelling unit;
(b) Designates at least one zoning district in which a tiny house
is allowed to be located and classified as a single-family residential
unit; or
(c) Designates at least one zoning district in which a tiny house
may be located in a tiny house park.
3. Before adopting an ordinance pursuant to subsection 1 or 2,
the governing body of a county or city must consider whether the
locations of tiny houses in the designated zoning districts will have
disproportionately high and adverse human health and
environmental effects on minority populations and low-income
populations.
4.] 2. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 1 [or 2:
(a) May:
(1) Include any other requirements for tiny houses that the
governing body determines is necessary; and
(2) Provide] may provide that a certificate of occupancy
issued for a tiny house may limit the tiny house to use as a single-
family [residential unit] residence or an accessory dwelling unit.
[(b) Shall require that a tiny house that is:
(1) Located in:
(I) A zoning district designated pursuant to paragraph (a)
of subsection 1 or paragraph (a) of subsection 2 is classified as an
accessory dwelling unit on any building permit or zoning approval
issued for the tiny house;
(II) A zoning district designated pursuant to paragraph (b)
of subsection 1 or paragraph (b) of subsection 2 is classified as a
single-family residential unit on any building permit or zoning
approval issued for the tiny house; and
(III) A zoning district designated pursuant to paragraph
(c) of subsection 1 or paragraph (c) of subsection 2 is classified as a
-
*AB443*

– 25 –
tiny house on any building permit or zoning approval issued within
the tiny house park.
(2) Not built on a permanent foundation may only be issued a
certificate of occupancy for the tiny house that is tied to the specific
parcel of land on which the tiny house is located. If the tiny house is
moved from that parcel, the owner of the tiny house must obtain a
new certificate of occupancy.
5.] 3. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 1 [or 2 that
allows for tiny houses to be located in tiny house parks] must also
establish requirements for tiny house parks, including, without
limitation, requirements for:
(a) Community water and wastewater service;
(b) Adequate spacing between tiny houses in the tiny house park
to allow for access for public safety services, including, without
limitation, access for firefighting equipment and vehicles and
utilities;
(c) [Minimum size requirements for each space in the tiny house
park for a tiny house;
(d)] The minimum or maximum lot size of a tiny house park;
and
[(e)] (d) Open space within the tiny house park . [; and
(f) Parking within the tiny house park.
6.] 4. An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 1 [or 2]
must define “tiny house” in accordance with the definition adopted
in the International Residential Code by the International Code
Council or its successor organization.
Sec. 24. NRS 278.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.320 1. “Subdivision” means any land, vacant or
improved, which is divided or proposed to be divided into five or
more lots, parcels, sites, units or plots, for the purpose of any
transfer or development, or any proposed transfer or development,
unless exempted by one of the following provisions:
(a) The term “subdivision” does not apply to any division of
land which is subject to the provisions of NRS 278.471 to 278.4725,
inclusive.
(b) Any joint tenancy or tenancy in common shall be deemed a
single interest in land.
(c) Unless a method of disposition is adopted for the purpose of
evading this chapter or would have the effect of evading this
chapter, the term “subdivision” does not apply to:
(1) Any division of land which is ordered by any court in this
State or created by operation of law;
(2) A lien, mortgage, deed of trust or any other security
instrument;
-
*AB443*

– 26 –
(3) A security or unit of interest in any investment trust
regulated under the laws of this State or any other interest in an
investment entity;
(4) Cemetery lots; or
(5) An interest in oil, gas, minerals or building materials,
which are now or hereafter severed from the surface ownership of
real property.
2. A common-interest community consisting of five or more
units shall be deemed to be a subdivision of land within the meaning
of this section, but need only comply with NRS 278.326 to 278.460,
inclusive, and 278.473 to 278.490, inclusive.
3. The board of county commissioners of any county may
exempt any parcel or parcels of land from the provisions of NRS
278.010 to 278.630, inclusive, and sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of
this act if:
(a) The land is owned by a railroad company or by a nonprofit
corporation organized and existing pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 81 or 82 of NRS which is an immediate successor in title to
a railroad company, and the land was in the past used in connection
with any railroad operation; and
(b) Other persons now permanently reside on the land.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, this chapter,
including, without limitation, any requirements relating to the
adjustment of boundary lines or the filing of a parcel map or record
of survey, does not apply to the division, exchange or transfer of
land for agricultural purposes if each parcel resulting from such a
division, exchange or transfer:
(a) Is 10 acres or more in size ; [, unless local zoning laws
require a larger minimum parcel size, in which case each parcel
resulting from the division, exchange or transfer must comply with
the parcel size required by those local zoning laws;]
(b) Has a zoning classification that is consistent with the
designation in the master plan, if any, regarding land use for the
parcel;
(c) Can be described by reference to the standard subdivisions
used in the United States Public Land Survey System;
(d) Qualifies for agricultural use assessment under NRS
361A.100 to 361A.160, inclusive, and any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto; and
(e) Is accessible:
(1) By way of an existing street, road or highway;
(2) Through other adjacent lands owned by the same person;
or
(3) By way of an easement for agricultural purposes that was
granted in connection with the division, exchange or transfer.
-
*AB443*

– 27 –
5. The exemption from the provisions of this chapter, which
exemption is set forth in subsection 4, does not apply with respect to
any parcel resulting from the division, exchange or transfer of
agricultural lands if:
(a) Such resulting parcel ceases to qualify for agricultural use
assessment under NRS 361A.100 to 361A.160, inclusive, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto; or
(b) New commercial buildings or residential dwelling units are
proposed to be constructed on the parcel after the date on which the
division, exchange or transfer took place. The provisions of this
paragraph do not prohibit the expansion, repair, reconstruction,
renovation or replacement of preexisting buildings or dwelling units
that are:
(1) Dilapidated;
(2) Dangerous;
(3) At risk of being declared a public nuisance;
(4) Damaged or destroyed by fire, flood, earthquake or any
natural or man-made disaster; or
(5) Otherwise in need of expansion, repair, reconstruction,
renovation or replacement.
Sec. 25. NRS 278A.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278A.470 The ordinance may require such information in the
application as is reasonably necessary to disclose to the city or
county:
1. The location and size of the site and the nature of the
landowner’s interest in the land proposed to be developed.
2. The density of land use to be allocated to parts of the site to
be developed.
3. The location and size of any common open space and the
form of organization proposed to own and maintain any common
open space.
4. The use and the approximate height, bulk and location of
buildings and other structures.
5. The ratio of residential to nonresidential use.
6. The feasibility of proposals for disposition of sanitary waste
and storm water.
7. The substance of covenants, grants or easements or other
restrictions proposed to be imposed upon the use of the land,
buildings and structures, including proposed easements or grants for
public utilities.
8. The [provisions for parking of vehicles and the] location and
width of proposed streets and public ways.
9. The required modifications in the municipal land use
regulations otherwise applicable to the subject property.
-
*AB443*

– 28 –
10. In the case of plans which call for development over a
period of years, a schedule showing the proposed times within
which additional applications for approval of all sections of the
planned unit development are intended to be filed.
Sec. 26. Section 8 of the Charter of Boulder City is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Section 8. Powers.
All powers of the City and the determination of all matters
of policy shall be vested in the City Council. By way of
illustration, and not by way of limitation, the Council shall
have the power to:
1. By a concurring vote of not less than three of its
members, appoint to and/or remove from office the following
city officers: (a) the City Manager; (b) the City Attorney; (c)
the City Clerk; and/or (d) the Municipal Judge; subject to
these provisions: (Add. 3; Amd. 1; 5-2-1967)
A. The appointments shall be for indefinite terms, and
each such officer shall receive such compensation and other
benefits as may be determined by resolution of the Council
from time to time.
B. Any City officer may be temporarily suspended with
full pay at any time by a majority vote of the Council, but no
City officer may be removed from office unless he or she has
first been given an opportunity for a hearing before the
Council. The Council shall not hold a closed meeting to
consider terminating such officer or to consider the character,
alleged misconduct, professional competence, or physical or
mental health of such public officer. The public officer may
be assisted by his or her own legal counsel at the hearing.
Any action of the Council following such hearing shall be
considered final and conclusive. Written notice of the
meeting shall be given to such officer in the manner set forth
in NRS 241.033. (Add. 25; Amd. 2; 6-2-2009)
C. If a city officer is so removed, the Council will
appoint a person as a temporary replacement to perform the
duties of the removed officer, and will appoint a qualified
person as a permanent replacement officer as soon as
practicable.
D. No person shall be appointed as a city officer who is
a grandparent, parent, uncle, aunt, brother, sister, nephew,
niece, child or grandchild, by birth, marriage, or adoption, of
a city officer, employee, or Council Member at the time of
appointment. (Add. 15; Amd. 2; 6-4-1991)
2. Establish other administrative departments and
distribute the work of divisions.
-
*AB443*

– 29 –
3. Adopt the budget of the City.
4. Inquire into the conduct of any office, department or
agency of the City and make investigations as to municipal
affairs. (1959 Charter)
5. Appoint the members of all boards, commissions, and
committees for specific or indefinite terms as provided
elsewhere in this Charter or in various resolutions or
ordinances, with all such persons being removable from
office only for cause, provided, however, that all persons so
appointed must be and remain bona fide residents of the City
during the tenure of each appointment. (Add. 15; Amd. 2;
6-4-1991)
6. Adopt plats. (1959 Charter)
7. Adopt and modify, from time to time, an official
general map of the entire City, and one or more official maps
of various portions of the City. (Add. 15; Amd. 2; 6-4-1991)
8. Regulate and restrict [the height and number of stories
of buildings and other structures, the size of yards and
courts,] the density of populations and the location and use of
buildings for trade, industry, business, residence or other
purposes. (1959 Charter)
9. Provide for an annual auditing of the City’s financial
accounts and records by independent auditors. (Add. 15;
Amd. 2; 6-4-1991)
10. (Repealed by Add. 15; Amd. 1; 6-5-1991)
11. Levy such taxes as are authorized by applicable
laws. (Add. 15; Amd. 2; 6-4-1991)
12. (Repealed by Add. 15; Amd. 1; 6-5-1991)
13. Except as required by federal law or state statute,
appoint no officer or employee of the City to any city board
or commission, other than as an ex officio member. (Add. 2;
Amd. 1; 5-4-1965; Amd. 2; 6-4-1991; Add. 24; Amd. 1;
6-3-2003)
14. (Add. 10; Amd. 6; 6-2-1981; Repealed by Add. 15;
Amd. 1; 6-5-1991)
Sec. 27. Section 23 of the Charter of Boulder City is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Section 23. Adoption of specialized, uniform codes.
[An] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413 and
chapter 278 of NRS, an ordinance adopting any specialized
or uniform building, plumbing or electrical code or codes,
printed in book or pamphlet form or any other specialized or
uniform code or codes of any nature whatsoever so printed,
may adopt such code, or any portion thereof, with such
changes as may be necessary to make the same applicable to
-
*AB443*

– 30 –
conditions in the City, and with such other changes as may be
desirable, by reference thereto, without the necessity of
reading the same at length as provided in section 22. Such
code, upon adoption, need not be published as required by
section 22 if an adequate number of copies of such code,
either typewritten or printed, with such changes, if any, have
been filed for use and examination by the public in the Office
of the City Clerk at least one week prior to the passage of the
ordinance adopting the code, or any amendment thereto.
Notice of such filing shall be given in accordance with the
provisions of section 22.3. (Add. 8; Amd. 9; 6-7-1977)
Sec. 28. Section 2.160 of the Charter of the City of Caliente,
being chapter 31, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1860, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 2.160 Powers of City Council: Fire protection;
regulation of explosives, inflammable materials; fire codes
and regulations. The City Council may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a Fire Department.
2. Provide for the appointment of a Fire Chief and
prescribe his or her duties.
3. Regulate or prohibit the storage of any explosive,
combustible or inflammable material in or transported
through the City, and prescribe the distance from any
residential or commercial area where it may be kept. Any
ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates
places of employment where explosives are stored must be at
least as stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by
the Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
4. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
Sec. 29. Section 2.180 of the Charter of the City of Caliente,
being chapter 31, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 61, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.180 Powers of City Council: Buildings;
construction and maintenance regulations; building and safety
codes. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
-
*AB443*

– 31 –
2. Adopt any building or safety code necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section and establish such fees as
may be necessary.
Sec. 30. Section 2.190 of the Charter of the City of Caliente,
being chapter 31, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 61, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.190 Powers of City Council: Zoning and
planning.
[1. The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may:
[(a)] 1. Divide the City into districts and regulate and
restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration,
repair or use of buildings, structures or land within such
districts.
[(b)] 2. Establish and adopt ordinances and regulations
relating to the subdivision of land.
[2. The City Council shall carry out the provisions of
subsection 1 in the manner prescribed by chapter 278 of NRS,
as amended from time to time.]
Sec. 31. Section 2.170 of the Charter of the City of Carlin,
being chapter 344, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1860, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 2.170 Powers of Board of Council Members: Fire
protection; regulation of explosives, inflammable materials;
fire codes and regulations. The Board of Council Members
may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a Fire Department.
2. Provide for the appointment of a Fire Chief and
prescribe his or her duties.
3. Regulate or prohibit the storage of any explosive,
combustible or inflammable material in or transported
through the City, and prescribe the distance from any
residential or commercial area where it may be kept. Any
ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates
places of employment where explosives are stored must be at
least as stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by
the Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
4. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
-
*AB443*

– 32 –
Sec. 32. Section 2.190 of the Charter of the City of Carlin,
being chapter 344, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 609, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.190 Powers of Board of Council Members:
Buildings; construction and maintenance regulations;
building and safety codes. [The] Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, the
Board of Council Members may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
2. Adopt any building or safety code necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section and establish such fees as
may be necessary.
Sec. 33. Section 2.200 of the Charter of the City of Carlin,
being chapter 344, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 609, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.200 Powers of Board of Council Members:
Zoning and planning.
1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the Board of Council Members
may:
(a) Divide the City into districts and regulate and restrict
the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or
use of buildings, structures or land within such districts.
(b) Establish and adopt ordinances and regulations
relating to the subdivision of land.
2. The Board of Council Members shall carry out the
provisions of subsection 1 in the manner prescribed by
chapter 278 of NRS, as amended from time to time.
Sec. 34. Section 2.130 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as amended by chapter 237,
Statutes of Nevada 2003, at page 1252, is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 2.130 Uniform codes: Procedure for adoption.
Except as otherwise provided in chapter 278 of NRS and
NRS 268.413 and 707.375, an ordinance adopting a uniform
building, plumbing, electrical, health, traffic or fire code, or
any other uniform code or codes, printed in book or pamphlet
form, may adopt such code or codes, or any portion thereof,
with such changes as may be necessary to make such code or
codes applicable to conditions in Carson City, and with such
other changes as may be desirable, by reference thereto.
Copies of such code or codes, either typewritten or printed,
with such changes, if any, shall be filed for use and
-
*AB443*

– 33 –
examination by the public in the Office of the Clerk at least 1
week prior to the passage of the ordinance adopting such code
or codes.
Sec. 35. Section 2.160 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as amended by chapter 118,
Statutes of Nevada 1985, at page 475, is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 2.160 Power of Board: Fire protection; fire codes
and regulations. The Board may:
1. Organize, regulate, maintain and disband a Fire
Department.
2. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
Sec. 36. Section 2.210 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, at page 298, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.210 Power of Board: Buildings; construction and
maintenance regulations; building and safety codes. [The]
Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413 and chapter
278 of NRS, the Board may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within Carson City.
2. Adopt any building or safety code or ordinance
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 37. Section 2.220 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as amended by chapter 96,
Statutes of Nevada 1997, at page 181, is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 2.220 Power of Board: Zoning and planning.
[1. The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the Board may:
[(a)] 1. Divide Carson City into districts and regulate
and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction,
alteration, repair or use of buildings, structures or land within
those districts.
[(b)] 2. Adopt master plans for Carson City which will
serve as a pattern and guide for the kind of orderly physical
growth and development of the City that will minimize
impairment of the City’s natural resources.
[(c)] 3. Establish and adopt ordinances and regulations
relating to the subdivision of land.
-
*AB443*

– 34 –
[2. The Board shall carry out the provisions of
subsection 1 in the manner prescribed by chapters 278 and
278A of NRS.]
Sec. 38. Section 2.200 of the Charter of the City of Elko,
being chapter 276, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 51, Statutes of Nevada 2001, at page 455, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.200 Powers of City Council: Fire protection;
regulation of explosives, inflammable materials; fire codes
and regulations. The City Council may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a Fire Department.
2. Provide for the appointment of a Fire Chief and
prescribe his or her duties.
3. Regulate or prohibit the storage of any explosive,
combustible or inflammable material in or transported
through the City, and prescribe the distance from any
residential or commercial area where it may be kept. Any
ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates
places of employment where explosives are stored must be at
least as stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by
the Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
4. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section, and to provide for the prevention,
suppression and extinguishment of fires and conditions
hazardous to life and property from fire, explosion or
combustion, and to provide for the enforcement of all such
codes and regulations by imposing adequate penalties for
violations thereof.
Sec. 39. Section 2.220 of the Charter of the City of Elko,
being chapter 276, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
51, Statutes of Nevada 2001, at page 456, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Sec. 2.220 Powers of City Council: Buildings;
construction and maintenance regulations; building and safety
codes. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, City Council may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
2. Adopt any building or safety code necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section and establish such fees as
may be necessary.
-
*AB443*

– 35 –
Sec. 40. Section 2.230 of the Charter of the City of Elko,
being chapter 276, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
51, Statutes of Nevada 2001, at page 456, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Sec. 2.230 Powers of City Council: Zoning and
planning. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may:
1. Divide the City into districts and regulate and restrict
the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or
use of buildings, structures or land within the districts.
2. Establish and adopt ordinances and regulations
relating to the subdivision of land.
Sec. 41. Section 2.160 of the Charter of the City of Henderson,
being chapter 266, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1862, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 2.160 Powers of City Council: Fire protection;
regulation of explosives, inflammable materials; fire codes
and regulations. The City Council may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a Fire Department.
2. Regulate or prohibit the storage of any explosive,
combustible or inflammable material in or transported
through the City, and prescribe the distance from any
residential or commercial area where it may be kept. Any
ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates
places of employment where explosives are stored must be at
least as stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by
the Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
3. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
Sec. 42. Section 2.180 of the Charter of the City of Henderson,
being chapter 266, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 408, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.180 Powers of City Council: Buildings;
construction and maintenance regulations; building and safety
codes. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
-
*AB443*

– 36 –
2. Adopt any building or safety code necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section and establish such fees as
may be necessary.
Sec. 43. Section 2.190 of the Charter of the City of Henderson,
being chapter 266, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
596, Statutes of Nevada 1995, at page 2209, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 2.190 Powers of City Council: Zoning and
planning. The City Council may adopt ordinances and
regulations relating to zoning and planning . [pursuant to]
Any such ordinance or regulation must comply with the
provisions of NRS 268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS.
Sec. 44. Section 2.170 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, as amended by chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1862, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 2.170 Powers of City Council: Fire protection;
regulation of explosives, inflammable materials; fire codes
and regulations. The City Council may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a Fire Department.
2. Regulate or prohibit the storage in or the
transportation through the City of any explosive, combustible
or inflammable material and prescribe the location within the
City where those materials may be kept. Any ordinance
adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates places of
employment where explosives are stored must be at least as
stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by the
Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
3. [Establish] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance , a
fire code and other regulations which are necessary to provide
for the prevention of and protection against fires and to carry
out the purposes of this section.
4. Suspend or revoke the license of any business for its
failure to comply with any regulation which is adopted
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 45. Section 2.200 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, at page 1400, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.200 Powers of City Council: Buildings;
construction and maintenance regulations; building and safety
codes. Subject to the limitations which are contained in
chapter 278 of NRS and NRS [278.580, 278.583 and]
-
*AB443*

– 37 –
268.413 and 444.340 to 444.430, inclusive, the City Council
may:
1. Regulate all matters which relate to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
2. Adopt any building, electrical, plumbing, mechanical
or safety code which is necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section and establish such fees as may be necessary.
Sec. 46. Section 2.210 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, at page 1400, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.210 Powers of City Council: Zoning and
planning.
1. The City Council may:
(a) Divide the City into districts and regulate and restrict
the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or
use of buildings, structures or land within those districts.
(b) Establish and adopt ordinances and regulations which
relate to the subdivision of land.
2. [The City Council must carry out the provisions of
subsection 1 in the manner which is prescribed by] Any
ordinance or regulation must comply with the provisions of
NRS 268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS.
Sec. 47. Section 2.150 of the Charter of the City of Mesquite,
being chapter 325, Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 1872, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.150 Powers of City Council: Fire protection;
regulation of explosives, inflammable materials; fire codes
and regulations. The City Council may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a fire department.
2. Regulate or prohibit the storage of any explosive,
combustible or inflammable material in or transported
through the City, and prescribe the distance from any
residential or commercial area where it may be kept. Any
ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates
places of employment where explosives are stored must be at
least as stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by
the Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
3. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
-
*AB443*

– 38 –
Sec. 48. Section 2.170 of the Charter of the City of Mesquite,
being chapter 325, Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 1872, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.170 Powers of City Council: Buildings;
construction and maintenance regulations; building and safety
codes. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
2. Adopt any building or safety code necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section and establish such fees as
may be necessary.
Sec. 49. Section 2.180 of the Charter of the City of Mesquite,
being chapter 325, Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 1872, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.180 Powers of City Council: Zoning and
planning. The City Council may adopt ordinances and
regulations relating to zoning and planning . [pursuant to]
Any ordinance or regulation must comply with the
provisions of NRS 268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS.
Sec. 50. Section 2.160 of the Charter of the City of North Las
Vegas, being chapter 573, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by
chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1863, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.160 Powers of City Council: Fire protection;
regulation of explosives, flammable materials; fire codes and
regulations. The City Council may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a Fire Department.
2. Regulate or prohibit the storage of any explosive,
combustible or flammable material in or transported through
the City, and prescribe the distance from any residential or
commercial area where it may be kept. Any ordinance
adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates places of
employment where explosives are stored must be at least as
stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by the
Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
3. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
-
*AB443*

– 39 –
Sec. 51. Section 2.180 of the Charter of the City of North Las
Vegas, being chapter 573, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended
by chapter 290, Statutes of Nevada 1991, at page 762, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.180 Powers of City Council: Buildings;
construction and maintenance regulations; building,
plumbing, electrical, mechanical, housing, sign and safety
codes.
1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may:
(a) Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance, use, occupancy and safety of buildings,
structures and property within the City.
(b) Adopt any building, plumbing, electrical, mechanical,
housing, sign or safety code necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section and establish such fees and
penalties as are necessary.
(c) Adopt any ordinance to prohibit the use or
maintenance of a building or structure for any activity that
violates the laws of the State or ordinances of the City or the
County in which the City is located, including, but not limited
to, laws or ordinances relating to the sale, distribution,
manufacture or use of controlled substances, gambling or
prostitution. The ordinance may include such penalties as are
necessary.
2. [Notwithstanding] Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection 1, if state law requires the adoption
by the City of a particular code or regulation, that, and no
other, must be adopted by the City as the exclusive authority
governing the subject concerned.
Sec. 52. Section 2.190 of the Charter of the City of North Las
Vegas, being chapter 573, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by
chapter 723, Statutes of Nevada 1973, at page 1439, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.190 Powers of City Council: Planning and
zoning.
1. The City Council may by ordinance:
(a) Establish an official map of the City, on which shall
be shown and indicated:
(1) All public streets existing and established by law at
the time of the establishment of the official map.
(2) All planned streets or street lines as located on
plats adopted by the Council in accordance with the
-
*AB443*

– 40 –
provisions of chapter 278 of NRS at the time of the
establishment of the map.
(3) All streets or street lines as located on final or
recorded plats of subdivisions approved by the Council at the
time of the establishment of the map. The placing of any
street or street lines upon the official map shall not, in and of
itself, constitute or be deemed to constitute the opening or
establishment of any street nor the taking or acceptance of
any land for street purposes. The Council may in the same
manner place upon the official map the location of existing or
planned parks or other public open spaces.
(b) Provide that no permit shall be issued for any building
or structure or any part thereon on any land located between
the mapped lines of a street as shown on the official map.
Thereafter, all street locations on final or recorded plats of
subdivisions or plats adopted by Council under the provisions
of chapter 278 of NRS, as amended from time to time, shall
be deemed additions to or modifications of the official map
and shall be placed thereon. The Council may by ordinance
make, from time to time, other additions to or modifications
of the official map by placing thereon the location of
proposed streets, street extensions, widenings, narrowings or
vacations. Any such proposed addition to or modification of
the official map shall be referred to the City Planning
Commission for its approval, but if the Planning Commission
disapproves or fails to act within 30 days, the Council by a
majority vote of its members may overrule such disapproval.
2. [The] Any ordinance adopted by the City Council
[shall carry out] related to planning or zoning must comply
with the provisions of NRS 268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS,
as amended from time to time.
Sec. 53. Section 2.110 of the Charter of the City of Reno,
being chapter 662, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 237, Statutes of Nevada 2003, at page 1254, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.110 Uniform codes: Procedure for adoption.
Except as otherwise provided in chapter 278 of NRS and
NRS 268.413 and 707.375, a uniform building, plumbing,
electrical, health, traffic or fire code, or any other uniform
code, printed in book or pamphlet form, or any portion
thereof, with such changes as may be necessary to make the
code applicable to conditions in the City, and with such other
changes as may be desirable, may be adopted in an ordinance
by reference thereto. Copies of the code, with such changes,
if any, must be filed for use and examination by the public in
-
*AB443*

– 41 –
the Office of the Clerk at least 1 week before the passage of
the ordinance adopting the code.
Sec. 54. Section 2.090 of the Charter of the City of Sparks,
being chapter 470, Statutes of Nevada 1975, as last amended by
chapter 325, Statutes of Nevada 2005, at page 1144, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.090 Powers of City Council: General areas.
[The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413 and
chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may exercise any
power specifically granted in this Charter or by any of the
provisions of Nevada Revised Statutes not in conflict with
this Charter, in order to:
1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 598D.150 and
640C.100, license all businesses, trades and professions for
purposes of regulation and revenue.
2. Enact and enforce fire ordinances.
3. Regulate the construction and maintenance of any
building or other structure within the City.
4. Provide for safeguarding of public health in the City.
5. Zone and plan the City, including the regulation of
subdivision of land, as prescribed by chapter 278 of NRS.
6. Acquire, control, lease, dedicate, sell and convey
rights-of-way, parks and other real property.
7. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 707.375,
regulate vehicular traffic and parking of vehicles.
8. Establish and maintain a sanitary sewer system.
9. Condemn property within the territorial limits of the
City, as well as property outside the territorial limits of the
City, in the manner prescribed by chapter 37 of NRS.
10. Regulate, prescribe the location for, prohibit or
suppress all businesses selling alcoholic liquors at wholesale
or retail.
11. Regulate, prescribe the location for, prohibit or
suppress gaming of all kinds.
Sec. 55. Section 2.170 of the Charter of the City of Wells,
being chapter 275, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1863, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 2.170 Powers of Board of Council Members: Fire
protection; regulation of explosives, inflammable materials;
fire codes and regulations. The Board of Council Members
may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a Fire Department.
2. Provide for the appointment of a Fire Chief and
prescribe his or her duties.
-
*AB443*

– 42 –
3. Regulate or prohibit the storage of any explosive,
combustible or inflammable material in or transported
through the City, and prescribe the distance from any
residential or commercial area where it may be kept. Any
ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates
places of employment where explosives are stored must be at
least as stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by
the Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
4. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
Sec. 56. Section 2.190 of the Charter of the City of Wells,
being chapter 275, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 463, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.190 Powers of Board of Council Members:
Buildings; construction and maintenance regulations;
building and safety codes. [The] Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, the
Board of Council Members may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
2. Adopt any building or safety code necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section and establish such fees as
may be necessary.
Sec. 57. Section 2.200 of the Charter of the City of Wells,
being chapter 275, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 463, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.200 Powers of Board of Council Members:
Zoning and planning.
[1. The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the Board of Council Members
may:
[(a)] 1. Divide the City into districts and regulate and
restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration,
repair or use of buildings, structures or land within such
districts.
[(b)] 2. Establish and adopt ordinances and regulations
relating to the subdivision of land.
[2. The Board of Council Members shall carry out the
provisions of subsection 1 in the manner prescribed by
chapter 278 of NRS, as amended from time to time.]
-
*AB443*

– 43 –
Sec. 58. Section 2.160 of the Charter of the City of Yerington,
being chapter 465, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1863, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 2.160 Powers of City Council: Fire protection;
regulation of explosives, inflammable materials; fire codes
and regulations. The City Council may:
1. Organize, regulate and maintain a Fire Department.
2. Provide for the appointment of a Fire Chief and
prescribe his or her duties.
3. Regulate or prohibit the storage of any explosive,
combustible or inflammable material in or transported
through the City, and prescribe the distance from any
residential or commercial area where it may be kept. Any
ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection that regulates
places of employment where explosives are stored must be at
least as stringent as the standards and procedures adopted by
the Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 618.890.
4. [Establish,] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
268.413 and chapter 278 of NRS, establish by ordinance, a
fire code and other regulations necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
Sec. 59. Section 2.180 of the Charter of the City of Yerington,
being chapter 465, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 907, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.180 Powers of City Council: Buildings;
construction and maintenance regulations; building and safety
codes. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
2. Adopt any building or safety code necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section and establish such fees as
may be necessary.
Sec. 60. Section 2.190 of the Charter of the City of Yerington,
being chapter 465, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 907, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.190 Powers of City Council: Zoning and
planning.
[1. The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.413
and chapter 278 of NRS, the City Council may:
[(a)] 1. Divide the City into districts and regulate and
restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration,
-
*AB443*

– 44 –
repair or use of buildings, structures or land within such
districts.
[(b)] 2. Establish and adopt ordinances and regulations
relating to the subdivision of land.
[2. The City Council shall carry out the provisions of
subsection 1 in the manner prescribed by chapter 278 of NRS,
as amended from time to time.]
Sec. 61. 1. The Administrator of the Housing Division of the
Department of Business and Industry shall appoint a task force to
study issues relating to housing during the 2025-2026 interim. The
study:
(a) Must include, without limitation, an analysis of whether
existing planning, zoning and land-use ordinances adopted by local
governments in this State are a barrier to the development of
housing; and
(b) May include any other issue relating to housing.
2. Membership on the task force must include, without
limitation:
(a) One member who is a policy expert in issues relating to
affordable housing;
(b) One member who is a policy expert in planning, zoning and
land use;
(c) One member who is an advocate for affordable housing;
(d) One member who represents the housing construction
industry;
(e) One member who represents a county in this State;
(f) One member who represents a city in this State;
(g) One member who represents the general public; and
(h) Any other person who has expertise that the Administrator of
the Housing Division finds would be helpful to the task force.
3. On or before February 1, 2027, the task force appointed
pursuant to subsection 1 shall submit a report of its findings and
recommendations to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmittal to the 84th Session of the Legislature.
4. The Housing Division shall provide administrative support
to the task force appointed pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 62. Any ordinance, regulation, rule, building code,
housing code or fire code enacted or adopted by a county or city
before, on or after October 1, 2025, which conflicts with the
provisions of this act is void.
Sec. 63. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 64. 1. This section and section 63 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
-
*AB443*

– 45 –
2. Sections 1 to 62, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB443*